Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.025

Creation of district—Duration.

To improve the ability of counties to finance long-term lake or beach management objectives, lake or beach management districts may be created for any needed period of time.

[ 2008 c 301 s 4; 2000 c 184 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2000 c 184: See note following RCW 39.96.010.